src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_VINIT_INDEP_aakozi_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     aakozi+VAI: aakozi
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+aakozi+VAI: niaakozi
     2+aakozi+VAI: giaakozi
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     aakozi+VAI+Neg: aakozisii
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     aakozi+VAI+1+Pl: aakozimin
     aakozi+VAI+2+Pl: aakozimw
     aakozi+VAI+3: aakoziw
     aakozi+VAI+X: aakozim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     aakozi+VAI+Dub: aakozidig
     aakozi+VAI+Prt: aakoziban
     aakozi+VAI+Prt+Dub: aakozigoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     aakozi+VAI+3+4: aakozian
     aakozi+VAI+3+Pl: aakoziag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg: niaakozisii
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg: giaakozisii
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl: niaakozimin
     1+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl: niaakozimw
     1+aakozi+VAI+3: niaakoziw
     1+aakozi+VAI+X: niaakozim
     2+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl: giaakozimin
     2+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl: giaakozimw
     2+aakozi+VAI+3: giaakoziw
     2+aakozi+VAI+X: giaakozim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+aakozi+VAI+Dub: niaakozidig
     1+aakozi+VAI+Prt: niaakoziban
     1+aakozi+VAI+Prt+Dub: niaakozigoban
     2+aakozi+VAI+Dub: giaakozidig
     2+aakozi+VAI+Prt: giaakoziban
     2+aakozi+VAI+Prt+Dub: giaakozigoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+aakozi+VAI+3+4: niaakozian
     1+aakozi+VAI+3+Pl: niaakoziag
     2+aakozi+VAI+3+4: giaakozian
     2+aakozi+VAI+3+Pl: giaakoziag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl: aakozisiimin
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl: aakozisiimw
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+3: aakozisiiw
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+X: aakozisiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+Dub: aakozisiidig
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+Prt: aakozisiiban
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub: aakozisiigoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+4: aakozisiian
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Pl: aakozisiiag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Dub: aakozimindig
     aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt: aakoziminban
     aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: aakozimingoban
     aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Dub: aakozimwdig
     aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt: aakozimwban
     aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: aakozimwgoban
     aakozi+VAI+3+Dub: aakoziwdig
     aakozi+VAI+3+Prt: aakoziwban
     aakozi+VAI+3+Prt+Dub: aakoziwgoban
     aakozi+VAI+X+Dub: aakozimdig
     aakozi+VAI+X+Prt: aakozimban
     aakozi+VAI+X+Prt+Dub: aakozimgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+3+4: aakoziminan
     aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+3+Pl: aakoziminag
     aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+3+4: aakozimwan
     aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+3+Pl: aakozimwag
     aakozi+VAI+3+3+4: aakoziwan
     aakozi+VAI+3+3+Pl: aakoziwag
     aakozi+VAI+X+3+4: aakoziman
     aakozi+VAI+X+3+Pl: aakozimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     aakozi+VAI+Dub+3+4: aakozidigan
     aakozi+VAI+Dub+3+Pl: aakozidigag
     aakozi+VAI+Prt+3+4: aakozibanan
     aakozi+VAI+Prt+3+Pl: aakozibanag
     aakozi+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+4: aakozigobanan
     aakozi+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: aakozigobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl: niaakozisiimin
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl: niaakozisiimw
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3: niaakozisiiw
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X: niaakozisiim
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl: giaakozisiimin
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl: giaakozisiimw
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3: giaakozisiiw
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X: giaakozisiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+Dub: niaakozisiidig
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+Prt: niaakozisiiban
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub: niaakozisiigoban
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+Dub: giaakozisiidig
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+Prt: giaakozisiiban
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub: giaakozisiigoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+4: niaakozisiian
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Pl: niaakozisiiag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+4: giaakozisiian
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Pl: giaakozisiiag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Dub: niaakozimindig
     1+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt: niaakoziminban
     1+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: niaakozimingoban
     1+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Dub: niaakozimwdig
     1+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt: niaakozimwban
     1+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: niaakozimwgoban
     1+aakozi+VAI+3+Dub: niaakoziwdig
     1+aakozi+VAI+3+Prt: niaakoziwban
     1+aakozi+VAI+3+Prt+Dub: niaakoziwgoban
     1+aakozi+VAI+X+Dub: niaakozimdig
     1+aakozi+VAI+X+Prt: niaakozimban
     1+aakozi+VAI+X+Prt+Dub: niaakozimgoban
     2+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Dub: giaakozimindig
     2+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt: giaakoziminban
     2+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: giaakozimingoban
     2+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Dub: giaakozimwdig
     2+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt: giaakozimwban
     2+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: giaakozimwgoban
     2+aakozi+VAI+3+Dub: giaakoziwdig
     2+aakozi+VAI+3+Prt: giaakoziwban
     2+aakozi+VAI+3+Prt+Dub: giaakoziwgoban
     2+aakozi+VAI+X+Dub: giaakozimdig
     2+aakozi+VAI+X+Prt: giaakozimban
     2+aakozi+VAI+X+Prt+Dub: giaakozimgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+3+4: niaakoziminan
     1+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+3+Pl: niaakoziminag
     1+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+3+4: niaakozimwan
     1+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+3+Pl: niaakozimwag
     1+aakozi+VAI+3+3+4: niaakoziwan
     1+aakozi+VAI+3+3+Pl: niaakoziwag
     1+aakozi+VAI+X+3+4: niaakoziman
     1+aakozi+VAI+X+3+Pl: niaakozimag
     2+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+3+4: giaakoziminan
     2+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+3+Pl: giaakoziminag
     2+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+3+4: giaakozimwan
     2+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+3+Pl: giaakozimwag
     2+aakozi+VAI+3+3+4: giaakoziwan
     2+aakozi+VAI+3+3+Pl: giaakoziwag
     2+aakozi+VAI+X+3+4: giaakoziman
     2+aakozi+VAI+X+3+Pl: giaakozimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+aakozi+VAI+Dub+3+4: niaakozidigan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Dub+3+Pl: niaakozidigag
     1+aakozi+VAI+Prt+3+4: niaakozibanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Prt+3+Pl: niaakozibanag
     1+aakozi+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+4: niaakozigobanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niaakozigobanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Dub+3+4: giaakozidigan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Dub+3+Pl: giaakozidigag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Prt+3+4: giaakozibanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Prt+3+Pl: giaakozibanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+4: giaakozigobanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giaakozigobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: aakozisiimindig
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: aakozisiiminban
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: aakozisiimingoban
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: aakozisiimwdig
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: aakozisiimwban
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: aakozisiimwgoban
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Dub: aakozisiiwdig
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt: aakozisiiwban
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub: aakozisiiwgoban
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Dub: aakozisiimdig
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt: aakozisiimban
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub: aakozisiimgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+4: aakozisiiminan
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl: aakozisiiminag
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+4: aakozisiimwan
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl: aakozisiimwag
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+3+4: aakozisiiwan
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+3+Pl: aakozisiiwag
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+3+4: aakozisiiman
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+3+Pl: aakozisiimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+4: aakozisiidigan
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+Pl: aakozisiidigag
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+4: aakozisiibanan
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+Pl: aakozisiibanag
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+4: aakozisiigobanan
     aakozi+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: aakozisiigobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5
     aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: aakozimindigan
     aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: aakozimindigag
     aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: aakoziminbanan
     aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: aakoziminbanag
     aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: aakozimingobanan
     aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: aakozimingobanag
     aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: aakozimwdigan
     aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: aakozimwdigag
     aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: aakozimwbanan
     aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: aakozimwbanag
     aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: aakozimwgobanan
     aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: aakozimwgobanag
     aakozi+VAI+3+Dub+3+4: aakoziwdigan
     aakozi+VAI+3+Dub+3+Pl: aakoziwdigag
     aakozi+VAI+3+Prt+3+4: aakoziwbanan
     aakozi+VAI+3+Prt+3+Pl: aakoziwbanag
     aakozi+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: aakoziwgobanan
     aakozi+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: aakoziwgobanag
     aakozi+VAI+X+Dub+3+4: aakozimdigan
     aakozi+VAI+X+Dub+3+Pl: aakozimdigag
     aakozi+VAI+X+Prt+3+4: aakozimbanan
     aakozi+VAI+X+Prt+3+Pl: aakozimbanag
     aakozi+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: aakozimgobanan
     aakozi+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: aakozimgobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: niaakozisiimindig
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: niaakozisiiminban
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: niaakozisiimingoban
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: niaakozisiimwdig
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: niaakozisiimwban
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: niaakozisiimwgoban
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Dub: niaakozisiiwdig
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt: niaakozisiiwban
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub: niaakozisiiwgoban
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Dub: niaakozisiimdig
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt: niaakozisiimban
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub: niaakozisiimgoban
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: giaakozisiimindig
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: giaakozisiiminban
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: giaakozisiimingoban
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: giaakozisiimwdig
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: giaakozisiimwban
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: giaakozisiimwgoban
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Dub: giaakozisiiwdig
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt: giaakozisiiwban
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub: giaakozisiiwgoban
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Dub: giaakozisiimdig
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt: giaakozisiimban
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub: giaakozisiimgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+4: niaakozisiiminan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl: niaakozisiiminag
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+4: niaakozisiimwan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl: niaakozisiimwag
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+3+4: niaakozisiiwan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+3+Pl: niaakozisiiwag
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+3+4: niaakozisiiman
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+3+Pl: niaakozisiimag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+4: giaakozisiiminan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl: giaakozisiiminag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+4: giaakozisiimwan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl: giaakozisiimwag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+3+4: giaakozisiiwan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+3+3+Pl: giaakozisiiwag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+3+4: giaakozisiiman
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+X+3+Pl: giaakozisiimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+4: niaakozisiidigan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+Pl: niaakozisiidigag
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+4: niaakozisiibanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+Pl: niaakozisiibanag
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+4: niaakozisiigobanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niaakozisiigobanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+4: giaakozisiidigan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+Pl: giaakozisiidigag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+4: giaakozisiibanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+Pl: giaakozisiibanag
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+4: giaakozisiigobanan
     2+aakozi+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giaakozisiigobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: niaakozimindigan
     1+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: niaakozimindigag
     1+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: niaakoziminbanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: niaakoziminbanag
     1+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: niaakozimingobanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niaakozimingobanag
     1+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: niaakozimwdigan
     1+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: niaakozimwdigag
     1+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: niaakozimwbanan
     1+aakozi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: niaakozimwbanag
